Idaho, session 2025, H0282.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-1002. FROM WHAT PROPERTY SELECTED. If the owner is married, the
homestead may consist of the community or jointly owned property of the
spouses or the separate property of either spouse: Provided, that the same
premises may not be claimed separately by the husband and wife with the ef-
fect of increasing the net value of the homestead available to the marital
community beyond the amount specified in section 55-1003, Idaho Code. Each
spouse may separately claim a homestead exemption in the amount specified in
section 55-1003, Idaho Code. When the owner is not married, the homestead
may consist of any of his or her property.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.